Hawaii statutes.
[§132C‑9] Reduced
ignition propensity cigarette program special fund. (a) There is
established in the state treasury a reduced ignition propensity cigarette
program special fund, into which shall be deposited all moneys collected by the
state fire council from the reduced ignition propensity cigarette program
pursuant to section 132C-4. All interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited
in the fund shall become part of the fund.

(b) Moneys in the reduced ignition propensity
cigarette program special fund shall be administered and expended by the state
fire council to defray the actual cost of activities and requirements of
section 132C-4, including employing one full-time administrator and one
full-time assistant whose duties include:

(1) Adopting administrative rules for program
implementation, establishing compliance inspections, and approving forms and
enforcement procedures and guidelines;

(2) Receiving certifications for approximately six
hundred different brands and styles of cigarettes from the manufacturers;

(3) Compiling a list of the cigarette brands and
styles for which manufacturers have submitted certifications, verifying tax
stamp compliance with the department of the attorney general, and posting the
list of certified brands and styles on a state website for informational
purposes only;

(4) Reviewing and approving, as needed, any
alternative test methods or fire standard compliance markings submitted by the
manufacturer; and

(5) If needed, submitting certified cigarettes to an
accredited laboratory for testing to verify that performance standards have
been met. [L 2011, c 189, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next